Washington statutes.
RCW 36.32.475

Regulation of automatic number or location identification—Prohibited.

No county may enact or enforce an ordinance or regulation mandating automatic number identification or automatic location identification for a private telecommunications system or for a provider of private shared telecommunications services.

[ 1995 c 243 s 8.]

NOTES:

Findings—Severability—1995 c 243: See notes following RCW 80.36.555.